Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 342.125 is amended to read:
342.125. (1) Teaching licenses shall be issued and renewed by  the Teacher Standards and Prac-
tices Commission by the authority of the State of Oregon, subject to ORS 342.120 to 342.430 and the
rules of the commission.
(2) Notwithstanding any requirements prescribed for issuance  of a license, a person whose ap-
plication for a license is pending may be employed in the public schools of this  state for 90 calendar
days after the date [ of submission of the application if: ] on which the commission determines the
person has satisfied any requirement for background  checks, including a criminal records
check as provided in ORS 181A.195 and a background check through  an interstate clearing-
house of revoked and suspended licenses, if:
[(a) The person is not ineligible for a  license following background checks conducted by the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, including  a criminal records check as provided in ORS
181A.195 and a background  check through an interstate clearinghouse of revoked and suspended li-
censes; ]
[(b)] (a) The school  district has completed the review of the employment history of the person
as required by ORS 339.374;
[(c)] (b) The person had not been employed as provided by this subsection during  the previous
12 months with a pending application for the same license; and
[(d)] (c)  The person and the school district have complied with any other requirements estab-
lished by the commission by rule.
(3) Subject to ORS 342.130 and to subsection (4) of  this section, licenses shall be of the following
types:
(a) Preliminary teaching license.
(b) Professional teaching license.
(c) Distinguished teacher leader license.
(d) Preliminary personnel service license.
(e) Professional personnel service license.
(f) Preliminary administrative license.
Enrolled Senate Bill 802 (SB 802-INTRO) Page 1
(g) Professional administrative license.
(h) Reciprocal license.
(i) Legacy license.
(4) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission  may establish other types of teaching li-
censes as the commission  considers necessary for operation of the public schools of the state and
may prescribe the qualifications for the  licenses. However, no license established under the au-
thority of this subsection is required for a regular classroom teaching position in  the public schools.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 342.127, any person who has held a  teaching license identified in sub-
section (3) of this  section or established as provided by subsection (4) of this section may, within
three years of  retirement and without payment of any fees or any other additional requirements,
convert the teaching license into a substitute teaching license.
(6)(a) The  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish a public charter school
teacher and administrator  registry. The commission shall require the applicant and the public
charter school to jointly submit an application requesting registration as a public charter  school
teacher or administrator. The application shall include:
(A) A description of the specific teaching or administrator position the applicant will fill;
(B) A description of the background of the applicant that  is relevant to the teaching or admin-
istrator position, including any post-secondary education or other experience; and
(C) Documentation  as required by the commission for the purposes of conducting a criminal re-
cords check as provided in ORS 181A.195 and  a background check through an interstate clearing-
house of revoked and suspended licenses.
(b) Subject to  the results of the criminal records check and background check and to informa-
tion received under ORS 342.143 (2), the commission shall approve the application for registration.
The commission may deny a request for registration only on the basis  of the criminal records check,
the background  check through an interstate clearinghouse of revoked and suspended licenses or the
information received under ORS 342.143 (2). The registration is valid for a term  established by the
commission and, subject to information received under ORS 342.143 (2), may  be renewed upon joint
application from the teacher or administrator and the public charter school.
(c) A registration as a public charter  school teacher qualifies its holder to accept the teaching
position described in the application in the  public charter school that submitted the application with
the holder of the registration.
(d) A registration  as a public charter school administrator qualifies its holder to accept the
administrator position described in the application in  the public charter school that submitted the
application with the holder of the registration.
(7)(a) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall adopt an expedited  process for the
issuance of any license established pursuant to this section. The expedited process may require  the
following:
(A) The showing of an urgent situation; and
(B) The joint request for the expedited process from the applicant for the license and:
(i) The school district superintendent or school district board;
(ii) The public charter school governing body; or
(iii) The education service district superintendent or  board of directors of the education service
district.
(b) Except as  provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection, the commission shall issue a license
as provided by this subsection within two working days after receiving a completed application.
(c) The commission may limit the number of applications the commission will accept under  this
subsection  from  a school district or an education service district to not more than 100 applications
in a period of two working days.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the commission may not distinguish between a school district
or an education service district involved in a  labor dispute and any other school district or educa-
tion service district.
Enrolled Senate Bill 802 (SB 802-INTRO) Page 2
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 342.125 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to  ap-
plications for a teaching license submitted to the Teacher Standards and Practices  Commis-
sion under ORS 342.120 to 342.430 on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 802 (SB 802-INTRO) Page 3